Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.010

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Advanced social work" means the application of social work theory and methods, including:

(a) Emotional and biopsychosocial assessment;

(b) Psychotherapy under the supervision of a licensed independent clinical social worker, psychiatrist, psychologist, psychiatric *advanced registered nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse, or other mental health professionals as may be defined by rules adopted by the secretary;

(c) Case management;

(d) Consultation;

(e) Advocacy;

(f) Counseling; or

(g) Community organization.

(2) "Applicant" means a person who completes the required application, pays the required fee, is at least eighteen years of age, and meets any background check requirements and uniform disciplinary act requirements.

(3) "Associate" means a prelicensure candidate who has a graduate degree in a mental health field under RCW 18.225.090 and is gaining the supervision and supervised experience necessary to become a licensed independent clinical social worker, a licensed advanced social worker, a licensed mental health counselor, or a licensed marriage and family therapist.

(4) "Committee" means the Washington state mental health counselors, marriage and family therapists, and social workers advisory committee.

(5) "Department" means the department of health.

(6) "Disciplining authority" means the department.

(7) "Independent clinical social work" means the diagnosis and treatment of emotional and mental disorders based on knowledge of human development, the causation and treatment of psychopathology, psychotherapeutic treatment practices, and social work practice as defined in advanced social work. Treatment modalities include but are not limited to diagnosis and treatment of individuals, couples, families, groups, or organizations.

(8) "Marriage and family therapy" means the diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional disorders, whether cognitive, affective, or behavioral, within the context of relationships, including marriage and family systems. Marriage and family therapy involves the professional application of psychotherapeutic and family systems theories and techniques in the delivery of services to individuals, couples, and families for the purpose of treating such diagnosed nervous and mental disorders. The practice of marriage and family therapy means the rendering of professional marriage and family therapy services to individuals, couples, and families, singly or in groups, whether such services are offered directly to the general public or through organizations, either public or private, for a fee, monetary or otherwise.

(9) "Mental health counseling" means the application of principles of human development, learning theory, psychotherapy, group dynamics, and etiology of mental illness and dysfunctional behavior to individuals, couples, families, groups, and organizations, for the purpose of treatment of mental disorders and promoting optimal mental health and functionality. Mental health counseling also includes, but is not limited to, the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of mental and emotional disorders, as well as the application of a wellness model of mental health.

(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

[2013 c 73 s 2; 2008 c 135 s 11; 2001 c 251 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.